Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0781.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 811gg. (1) The secretary of state shall develop and issue a special fund-raising Upper Peninsula plate for the preservation and support of the Upper Peninsula by the Upper Peninsula board created in section 811kk. The plate authorized in this section must be the design winner. As used in this subsection, "design winner" means the design chosen by the Upper Peninsula plate commission under section 811ll. (2) The owner of a vehicle required to be registered under this act may apply under section 217, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, for the Upper Peninsula plate instead of a standard registration plate. In addition to the vehicle registration tax prescribed under section 801, an applicant for an Upper Peninsula plate must provide with the application the following fees, as applicable: (a) For a new plate, a $25.00 donation to the Upper Peninsula board, the fee prescribed under section 804, and a $5.00 fee to repay the cost of the initial manufacture of the plate that would have been charged under section 811e. (b) For a renewal plate, a $10.00 donation and the fee prescribed under section 804. (c) For a replacement plate, only the fee prescribed under section 804. (3) The secretary of state shall transfer the donation money from the sale of the Upper Peninsula plates to the state treasurer, who shall credit the donation money to the Upper Peninsula grant fund established under subsection (5). (4) The secretary of state may issue a temporary registration permit to an individual who submits an application and the required fees for an Upper Peninsula plate, if the applicant's current vehicle registration will expire before the individual's receipt of an organization plate. The temporary registration expires on the applicant's receipt of the Upper Peninsula plate or on the expiration of 60 days after the date of issuance, whichever occurs first. A temporary permit issued under this subsection must be issued without charge. (5) The Upper Peninsula grant fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. The fund must be expended only as provided by the Upper Peninsula board created in section 811kk. (6) The state treasurer shall disburse money in the fund on an annual basis to the Upper Peninsula board created in section 811kk. Beginning not later than September 1, 2028, the Upper Peninsula board shall submit to the state treasurer a summary of the expenditures during the preceding year of the money received under this section. (7) The legislature recognizes the Upper Peninsula as a unique and vital region and that the funds spent by the Upper Peninsula board will benefit a statewide and public purpose. Sec. 811kk. (1) The Upper Peninsula board is created in the department. (2) The governor shall appoint 5 members to the board from a nonpartisan list provided by the senators with a district located in the Upper Peninsula. The governor shall appoint at least 1 individual who has financial or accounting expertise and 1 individual with experience in charitable work. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members of the Upper Peninsula board not later than 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) The term of a member of the board is 2 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The governor may remove a member of the board for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or for any other good cause. (7) The governor shall call the first meeting of the board. At the first meeting, the board shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The board shall meet at least twice annually or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 3 or more members. (8) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by 3 of the members of the board serving is required for any action of the board. (9) The board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (10) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the board in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (11) A member of the board is not entitled to compensation for service on the board, but the board may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (12) The board shall do all of the following: (a) Solicit applications for Upper Peninsula grants from eligible recipients. (b) Score grant applications based on publicly available criteria established by the board. (c) Administer the Upper Peninsula grant fund and expend money from that fund by awarding the Upper Peninsula grants to recipients that do all of the following: (i) Support and preserve commerce, arts, and history in the Upper Peninsula. (ii) Operate for the benefit of the citizens and communities of the Upper Peninsula. (d) Subject to this section, award money from the Upper Peninsula grant fund in an amount up to the amount requested by the eligible recipient. (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, disqualify an applicant as an eligible recipient if the applicant was awarded money the previous 2 years. If the board does not receive more than 10 applications from eligible recipients in a year, the board may award money to an applicant in consecutive years. (13) The board shall not award a grant for greater than 10% of the money in the fund to a single applicant in a given year unless the board votes unanimously to award the grant. (14) The board shall award the first Upper Peninsula grants not later than 3 years after the creation of the Upper Peninsula grant fund. (15) The board may call for the appointment of a new Upper Peninsula plate commission under section 811ll to redesign the special fund-raising Upper Peninsula plate under section 811gg. The board shall not call for a new appointment under this subsection before 5 years after the most recent design winner was chosen under section 811ll. Sec. 811ll. (1) The Upper Peninsula plate commission is created in the department of state. (2) The Upper Peninsula plate commission consists of 5 residents of the Upper Peninsula chosen by the governor with the approval of at least 2 legislators with districts representing the Upper Peninsula. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members to the Upper Peninsula plate commission not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) Members of the Upper Peninsula plate commission shall serve for terms of 2 years, except that of the members first appointed, 2 members shall serve for 2 years and 3 members shall serve for 3 years. The commission shall disband on the date the commission's duties under subsection (11) are completed. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the Upper Peninsula plate commission, the new appointment for the remaining term must be completed in the same manner as the original appointment. (6) The first meeting of the Upper Peninsula plate commission must be called by the first individual appointed by the governor. At the first meeting, the Upper Peninsula plate commission shall elect from among its members a chairperson and other officers as it considers necessary or appropriate, and shall determine the schedule of meetings necessary to effect the purpose of the Upper Peninsula plate commission. (7) A majority of the members of the Upper Peninsula plate commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the Upper Peninsula plate commission. A majority vote of the members present and serving is required for official action of the Upper Peninsula plate commission. (8) The business that the Upper Peninsula plate commission may perform must be conducted at a public meeting of the Upper Peninsula plate commission held in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (9) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the Upper Peninsula plate commission in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) Members of the Upper Peninsula plate commission serve without compensation. However, members of the Upper Peninsula plate commission may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the official duties as members of the Upper Peninsula plate commission. (11) The Upper Peninsula plate commission shall do all of the following in executing the Upper Peninsula plate design contest and selecting the design winner: (a) Accept design submissions from 3 months after the commencement of the contest to 6 months after the commencement of the contest. (b) Create and publish rules for the Upper Peninsula plate design contest. The rules must include that the plate design must feature the outline of the Upper Peninsula and the words "Someplace Special". (c) Ensure that all copyright interests in design submissions have been relinquished at the time of submission. (d) Advertise and promote the Upper Peninsula plate design contest. (e) Announce the design winner on or before March 1, 2027.